Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5329.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 261g. (1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3), and subject to subsection (2), and beginning 1 year after the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section, a public entity shall not contract with a person for the purchase or acquisition of a drone that includes software that was made, manufactured, or developed in whole or in part by an entity that is included in any of the following: (a) The list published under section 1260H of the William M. (Mac) Thornberry national defense authorization act for fiscal year 2021, Public Law 116-283. (b) The Chinese Military-Industrial Complex Sanction List published under 31 CFR part 586. (c) 15 CFR part 744, supplement no. 4. (2) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3), a public entity is subject to the same restrictions and prohibitions that apply to the purchase or acquisition of drones that apply to the federal government. (3) This section does not apply to a public entity that is acting in compliance with section 16 of the unmanned aircraft systems act, 2016 PA 436, MCL 259.316. (4) As used in this section, "public entity" means that term as defined in section 1 of 1968 PA 317, MCL 15.321. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 5330 (request no. H03696'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.